en: Olive oils from Viannos Irakliou Kritis
el: Eλαιόλαδα Βιάννος Ηρακλείου Κρήτης
fr: Huile d'olive de Viannos Irakliou Kritis
hr: Maslinova ulja iz viannos irakliou kritis
it: Olio di oliva Viannos Irakliou Kritis
nl: Olijfoliën uit Viannos Irakliou Kritis, Olijfolies uit Viannos Irakliou Kritis
pt: Azeites do Viannos Irakliou Kritis

en: Olive oils from Vorios Mylopotamos Rethymnis Kritis
el: Eλαιόλαδα Βόρειος Μυλοπόταμος Ρεθύμνης Κρήτης
fr: Huile d'olive de Vorios Mylopotamos Rethymnis Kritis
hr: Maslinova ulja iz vorios mylopotamos rethymnis kritis
it: Olio di oliva Vorios Mylopotamos Rethymnis Kritis
nl: Olijfoliën uit Vorios Mylopotamos Rethymnis Kritis, Olijfolies uit Vorios Mylopotamos Rethymnis Kritis
pt: Azeites do Vorios Mylopotamos Rethymnis Kritis

en: Olive oils from Zakynthos
el: Eλαιόλαδα Ζάκυνθος
fr: Huile d'olive de Zakynthos
hr: Maslinova ulja sa zakintosa
it: Olio di oliva Zakynthos
nl: Olijfoliën uit Zakynthos, Olijfolies uit Zakynthos
pt: Azeites do Zakynthos

en: Olive oils from Portugal, Portugese oilive oils
de: Olivenöle aus Portugal
fr: Huiles d'olive de Portugal
hr: Maslinova ulja iz portugala
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Portugalijos
nl: Olijfoliën uit Portugal, Portugese olijfoliën, Olijfolies uit Portugal, Portugese olijfolies
sv: Olivoljor från Portugal, Portugisiska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from Alentejo Interior
fr: Huile d'olive de Alentejo Interior
hr: Maslinova ulja iz unutrašnjosti alenteja
it: Olio di oliva Alentejo Interior
nl: Olijfoliën uit Alentejo Interior, Olijfolies uit Alentejo Interior
pt: Azeites do Alentejo Interior

en: Olive oils from Beira Interior
fr: Huile d'olive de Beira Interior
hr: Maslinova ulja iz unutrašnjosti beira
it: Olio di oliva Beira Interior
nl: Olijfoliën uit Beira Interior, Olijfolies uit Beira Interior
pt: Azeites da Beira Interior

en: Olive oils from Beira Alta
fr: Huile d'olive de Beira Alta
hr: Maslinova ulja iz beira alta
it: Olio di oliva Beira Alta
nl: Olijfoliën uit Beira Alta, Olijfolies uit Beira Alta
pt: Azeites da Beira Alta

en: Olive oils from Beira Baixa
fr: Huile d'olive de Beira Baixa
hr: Maslinova ulja iz beira baixa
it: Olio di oliva Beira Baixa
nl: Olijfoliën uit Beira Baixa, Olijfolies uit Beira Baixa
pt: Azeites da Beira Baixa

en: Olive oils from Moura
fr: Huile d'olive de Moura
hr: Maslinova ulja iz moura
it: Olio di oliva Moura
nl: Olijfoliën uit Moura, Olijfolies uit Moura
pt: Azeites de Moura

en: Olive oils from Norte Alentejano
fr: Huile d'olive de Norte Alentejano
hr: Maslinova ulja iz norte alentejano
it: Olio di oliva Norte Alentejano
nl: Olijfoliën uit Norte Alentejano, Olijfolies uit Norte Alentejano
pt: Azeites do Norte Alentejano

en: Olive oils from Ribatejo
fr: Huile d'olive de Ribatejo
hr: Maslinova ulja iz ribateja
it: Olio di oliva Ribatejo
nl: Olijfoliën uit Ribatejo, Olijfolies uit Ribatejo
pt: Azeites do Ribatejo

en: Olive oils from Trás-os-Montes
fr: Huile d'olive de Trás-os-Montes
hr: Maslinova ulja iz trás-os-montes
it: Olio di oliva Trás-os-Montes
nl: Olijfoliën uit Trás-os-Montes, Olijfolies uit Trás-os-Montes
pt: Azeite de Trás-os-Montes

en: Olive oils from Maroc, Maroccan olive oils
da: Olivenolier fra Marokko, Marokkanske olivenolier
fr: Huiles d'olive de Maroc
hr: Marokanska maslinova ulja
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Maroko
nl: Olijfoliën uit Marokko, Olijfolies uit Marokko, Marokkaanse olijfolies, Marokkaanse olijfoliën
sv: Olivoljor från Marocko, Marockanska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from Tunisia, Tunisian olive oils
da: Olivenolier fra Tunesien, Tunesiske olivenolier
fr: Huiles d'olive de Tunisie
hr: Maslinovo ulje iz tunisa
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Tuniso
nl: Olijfoliën uit Tunesië, Olijfolies uit Tunesië, Tunesische olijfolies, Tunesische olijfoliën
sv: Olivoljor från Tunisien, Tunisiska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from Algeria, Algerian olive oils
da: Olivenolier fra Algeriet, Algeriske olivenolier
fr: Huiles d'olive d'Algerie
hr: Maslinova ulja iz alžira
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Alžyro
nl: Olijfoliën uit Algerije, Olijfolies uit Algerije, Algeriaanse olijfolies, Algeriaanse olijfoliën
sv: Olivoljor från Algeriet, Algeriska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from South Africa, South African olive oils
da: Olivenolier fra Sydafrika, Sydafrikanske olivenolier
fr: Huiles d'olive d'Afrique du Sud
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Južne Afrike
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Pietų Afrikos
nl: Olijfoliën uit Zuid-Afrika, Olijfolies uit Zuid-Afrika, Zuid-Afrikaanse olijfolies, Zuid-Afrikaanse olijfoliën
sv: Olivoljor från Sydafrika, Sydafrikanska olivoljor

en: Olive oils from Argentina, Argentinian olive oils
da: Olivenolier fra Argentina, Argentinske olivenolier
fr: Huiles d'olive d'Argentine
hr: Maslinova ulja iz argentine
lt: Alyvuogių aliejai iš Argentinos
nl: Olijfoliën uit ZuidArgentina, Olijfolies uit ArgentinaAfrika, Argentijnse olijfolies, Argentijnse olijfoliën
sv: Olivoljor från Argentina, Argentinska olivoljor

en: Palm oils
bg: Палмово масло
da: Palmeolier
de: Palmöle
es: Aceites de palma
fr: Huiles de palme, Huiles de palme alimentaire, Huiles de palm
hr: Palmina ulja
it: Olio di palma
ja: パーム油
lt: Palmių aliejus
nl: Palmoliën
sv: Palmoljor, Palmolja
zh: 棕榈油

en: Palm oil refined
fr: Huile de palme raffinée
hr: Palmino ulje rafinirano
lt: Rafinuotas palmių aliejus

en: Poppyseed oils, Poppy seed oils, Poppy oils
de: Mohnöle
es: Aceites de amapola
fr: Huiles de pavot
hr: Ulja sjemenki maka
it: Olio di semi di papavero
lt: Aguonų aliejai, Aguonų sėklų aliejus, Aguonų aliejus
nl: Maanzaadoliën
sv: Vallmooljor, Vallmoolja